Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202672-2701
Nebraska Technology Infrastructure Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Nebraska Technology Infrastructure Cash Fund is created. The fund shall consist of revenue and transfers credited to the fund as authorized by law. Money shall be appropriated from the fund to state agencies for making payments on projects as determined by the Legislature, including, but not limited to, purchases of software, information technology hardware, and related implementation and modernization. The fund shall be administered by the State Treasurer as a multiple-agency-use fund and appropriated to state agencies as determined by the Legislature. Any money in the Nebraska Technology Infrastructure Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Any investment earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the General Fund.

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 181.
April 8, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.